California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 grade-separated mass transit system, if construction of such facilities has been found to be not inconsistent with the regional transportation plan of the transportation planning agency. Within such five-year period, the transportation planning agency may order the amount of the allocation in any year to be set aside and accumulated for accomplishment of the particular project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.1.

Commencing with claims for the 1980–81 fiscal year, an operator that was in compliance with Section 99268 during the 1978–79 fiscal year in order to be eligible for funds under this article shall be eligible for such funds in any fiscal year, if it remains in compliance with that section during the fiscal year. The determination of compliance for any fiscal year shall be made in the same manner as the determination was made for the 1978–79 fiscal year, except for the exemption provided under Section 99267.5. An allowance for depreciation shall be made in the same manner as provided in the 1978–79 fiscal year.

For purposes of this section, an operator granted a waiver from the requirements of Section 99268 pursuant to Section 99268.8, as it read on January 1, 1979, shall not be deemed in compliance with that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1124, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.2.

In the case of an operator required to be in compliance with Section 99268 under Section 99268.1, the operator may be allocated additional funds that could not be allocated to it because of those requirements, if it maintains, for the fiscal year, a ratio of fare revenues to operating cost, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 99247, at least equal to one-fifth if serving an urbanized area or one-tenth if serving a nonurbanized area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 716, Sec. 4.   (SB 508)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.20.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and except as specified in subdivision (b), Sections 99268, 99268.1, 99268.2, 99268.3, 99268.4, 99268.5, 99268.6, 99268.7, 99268.8, 99268.9, 99268.11, 99268.12, 99268.16, 99268.17, 99268.18, 99268.19, 99269, 99270.1, 99270.2, 99270.5, and 99270.6 do not apply to an operator for a fiscal year in which the operator expended from local funding an amount for transit operations not less than the amount the operator expended from local funding for transit operations during the 2018–19 fiscal year. As used in this subdivision, “local funding” means any nonstate grant funds or other revenues generated by, earned by, or distributed to, an operator.

(b) (1) For purposes of verifying the
 expenditures described in subdivision (a), the Controller may request fiscal data from the operator or conduct an audit of the operator.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the operator fails to comply with the Controller’s request for fiscal data within 120 days of receiving the request, as determined by the Controller, the sections listed in subdivision (a) apply to the operator.

(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the Controller, through an audit of the operator, determines that the operator did not meet the requirements of subdivision (a), the sections listed in subdivision (a) apply to the operator.

(4) An operator to which the sections listed in subdivision (a) apply pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) shall reimburse the state for any funds spent unlawfully.

(c) The Controller shall not require an operator to which the sections listed in subdivision (a) do not apply pursuant to subdivision (a) to report data submitted or collected only for purposes of complying with those sections.

(d) (1) On or before November 30, 2025, the department shall submit a report to the Legislature on the revenue vehicle hours, ridership, and passenger mile impacts on the services offered by operators to which the sections listed in subdivision (a) do not apply pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1,
 2027, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 81, Sec. 9.   (AB 149)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.3.

(a) In the case of an operator that is serving an urbanized area, and that was eligible for funds under this article during the 1978–79 fiscal year even though not required to be in compliance with Section 99268 or that commenced operation after that fiscal year, the operator shall be eligible for those funds in any fiscal year, commencing with claims for the 1980–81 fiscal year, if it maintains, for the fiscal year, a ratio of fare revenues to operating cost, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 99247, at least equal to one-fifth.

(b) In the case of an operator that is serving an urbanized area, and that was in operation during the 1978–79
 fiscal year even though not then eligible for funds under this article, but that has since become eligible for those funds, the operator shall be eligible for the funds in any fiscal year, commencing with the 1980–81 fiscal year, if it complies with either of the following:

(1) The requirements of Section 99268.

(2) The requirements of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 716, Sec. 5.   (SB 508)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.4.

In the case of an operator that is serving a nonurbanized area, and that was eligible for funds under this article during the 1978–79 fiscal year even though not required to be in compliance with Section 99268 or that commenced operation after that fiscal year, the operator shall be eligible for those funds in any fiscal year, commencing with claims for the 1980–81 fiscal year, if it maintains, for the fiscal year, a ratio of fare revenues to operating cost, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 99247, at least equal to one-tenth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 716, Sec. 6.   (SB 508)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.5.

(a) Commencing with claims for the 1980–81 fiscal year, no funds shall be allocated under this article in any fiscal year to an operator providing services using vehicles for the exclusive use of elderly and disabled persons, unless the operator maintains, for the fiscal year, a ratio of fare revenues to operating cost, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 99247, for those services at least
 equal to one-tenth or to the ratio it had for those services during the 1978–79 fiscal year, whichever is greater.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an operator which provides both exclusive transportation services for elderly and disabled persons and regular scheduled public transportation services may be allocated funds under this article for the exclusive service if the combined services qualify under Section 99268.1, 99268.2, 99268.3, or 99268.4, as the case may be, and the ratio of fare revenues to operating cost for the combined service shall not be less than the ratio required in order to make allocations to the operator for its regular scheduled services.

(c) In a county which had less than 500,000 population as determined by the 1970 federal decennial census and more than 500,000 in population as determined by the 1980 or 1990 federal decennial census, an operator in
 the county shall maintain a ratio of fare revenues to operating cost, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 99247, at least equal to one-fifth if serving an urbanized area or one-tenth if serving a nonurbanized area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 15.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.6.

(a) If a joint powers entity providing public transportation services was funded at any time under this article and is subsequently dissolved, any succeeding entity providing such services shall not be eligible for funding, unless it conforms to Section 99268.1, 99268.2, 99268.3, 99268.4, 99268.5, or 99268.9, as the case may be, which applied to its predecessor.

(b) Except a city or a county filing a claim pursuant to Section 99260.7, no public agency providing public transportation services, after withdrawing from, or while remaining in, a joint powers entity providing public
 transportation services, shall be eligible for funding under this article, unless it conforms to Section 99268.1, 99268.2, 99268.3, 99268.4, or 99268.9, as the case may be, that the joint powers entity is required to conform with in order to be eligible for such funding at the time the public agency commences its public transportation services. The public agency is an operator and shall be subject to Section 99268.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1002.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.7.

Any unallocated funds resulting from the limitations of Section 99268 may be used for capital intensive transit-related improvements. Every effort shall be made to obtain federal funds for the purposes of this section. Such improvements shall include, but not be limited to, park-and-ride lots, terminal facilities, bus waiting shelters, exclusive lanes for buses, and the acquisition of vehicles and rolling stock for replacement purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.8.

The required ratios of fare revenues to operating cost prescribed by this article shall not apply to an extension of public transportation services until two years after the end of the fiscal year in which the extension of services was put into operation. As used in this section, “extension of public transportation services” includes additions of geographical areas or route miles, or improvements in service frequency or hours of service greater than 25 percent of the route total, or the addition of new days of service, and for transit service claimants also includes the addition of a new type of service, such as van, taxi, or bus.

Within 90 days after the end of the first year of implementation, the operator shall submit to the transportation planning agency, the county transportation commission, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board having jurisdiction over it, a report on the extension of public transportation services, including, but not limited to, the area served, the revenues generated, and the cost to provide the extended services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1399, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1399.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.9.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), if an operator was allocated funds under this article during a fiscal year in which it did not maintain the required ratio of fare revenues to operating cost, the operator’s eligibility to receive moneys from the local transportation fund and allocations pursuant to Sections 99313.3 and 99314.3 shall be reduced during a subsequent penalty year by the amount of the difference between the required fare revenues and the actual fare revenues for the fiscal year that the required ratio was not maintained. The penalty year shall be the fiscal year that begins one year after the end of the fiscal year during which the required ratio was not maintained.

(2) An operator subject to this
 subdivision shall demonstrate to the transportation planning agency, the county transportation commission, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board how it will achieve the required ratio of fare revenues during any penalty year.

(b) The first fiscal year for which an operator does not maintain the required ratio of fare revenues to operating cost is deemed a grace year, and shall not result in any penalty nor loss of eligibility for funds under this article.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board shall not impose the penalty described in subdivision (a) on an operator that does not maintain the required ratio of fare revenues to operating cost during the 2019–20, 2020–21, 2021–22, 2022–23, 2023–24, 2024–25,
 2025–26, or 2026–27
 fiscal year.

(2) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 3.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.11.

Sections 99268.3, 99268.4, and 99268.9 may be waived by the transportation planning agency with respect to an operator during any fiscal year in which both of the following occurred, if the waiver is necessary to enable the operator to provide vital public transportation services:

(a) The operator sustained two separate work stoppages for 15 days or longer due to labor disputes.

(b) At least one of the work stoppages was not related to a labor dispute with the operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 115, Sec. 4.   Effective May 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.12.

Notwithstanding Sections 99268.2 and 99268.3, the transportation planning agency or the county transportation commission may set the required ratio of fare revenue to operating cost at not less than three-twentieths for an operator in a county with a population of 500,000 or less and serving an urbanized area where funds may be allocated under Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400). Prior to setting the required ratio, the transportation planning agency or the county transportation commission shall make findings specifying the reasons for its action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 157.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.16.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 99247, the costs of providing ridesharing services are excluded from operating costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1143, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.17.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 99247, all of the following costs shall be excluded from the definition of “operating cost” for the purposes of calculating any required ratios of fare revenues to operating cost specified in this article:

(1) The operating costs required to provide comparable complementary paratransit service as required by Section 37.121 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, pursuant to the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), as identified in the operator’s paratransit plan
 pursuant to Section 37.139 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations.

(2) Cost increases beyond the change in the Consumer Price Index for all of the following:

(A) Fuel.

(B) Alternative fuel programs.

(C) Power, including electricity.

(D) Insurance premiums and payments in settlement of claims arising out of the operator’s liability.

(E) State and federal mandates.

(3) Startup costs for new services for a period of not more than two years.

(4) Costs required to operate demand-response and microtransit services that expand access to transit service beyond fixed route corridors. For purposes of this paragraph, “microtransit” has the same meaning as in Section 99314.6.

(5) Costs of funding or improving payment and ticketing systems and services.

(6) Costs of security services and public safety contracts.

(7) Any expense greater than the actuarially determined contribution associated with pensions and other post-employment
 benefits as required by Governmental Accounting Board Statement Numbers 68 and 75.

(8) Costs of planning for improvements in transit operations, integration with other operators and agencies, transitioning to zero-emission operations, and for compliance with state and federal mandates.

(b) The exclusion of costs from the definition of operating costs in subdivision (a) applies solely for the purpose of this article and does not authorize an operator to report an operating cost other than as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 99247 or a ratio of fare revenue to operating cost other than as that ratio is described elsewhere in this article, to any of the following entities:

(1) The
 Controller pursuant to Section 99243.

(2) The entity conducting the fiscal audit pursuant to Section 99245.

(3) The entity conducting the performance audit pursuant to Section 99246.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 81, Sec. 7.   (AB 149)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.18.

The exclusions contained in Sections 99268.10, 99268.16, and 99268.17 shall not be applicable for purposes of determining an operator’s compliance with Section 99268.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 800, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

99268.19.

If fare revenues are insufficient to meet the applicable ratio of fare revenues to operating cost required by this article, an operator may satisfy that requirement by supplementing its fare revenues with local funds and calculating all free and reduced transit fares at their current full retail value. As used in this section, “local funds” means any nonstate grant funds or other revenues generated by, earned by, or distributed to an operator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 81, Sec. 8.   (AB 149)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

99269.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, all operators providing service within the area under the jurisdiction of the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board and filing claims pursuant to Section 99260 shall be considered a single operator. In order for all those operators to be eligible for funds under this article, an areawide ratio of fare revenues to operating cost, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 99247, shall be determined on the basis of the total operating cost and total fare revenues of all the operators, which ratio shall not be less than the areawide ratio for the 1978–79 fiscal
 year.

(b) In calculating the areawide ratio for the 1978–79 fiscal year, only the fare revenues and the operating costs of those operators that are in compliance with Section 99268, 99268.1, 99268.2, or 99268.3, whichever section was applicable to the operator during the 1978–79 fiscal year, are to be used.

(c) During the period of the first two years of operation, a new operator subject to this section shall claim each year no more than 75 percent of its total operating cost for that year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1055, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

99270.

On or after the first day of any fiscal year, an operator may engage in temporary borrowing pursuant to Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850), Chapter 4, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code and for such purposes “revenues” as defined in Sections 53856 and 53858 of that code may include the amount of any claim permitted under this article if a claim has been filed and approved. The amount of any claim for the purposes of this section shall be subject to the limitations on claims specified in this chapter; provided that the calculations of the limitations referred to herein may be based upon estimates of the operator.

The payments made for temporary borrowing authorized under this section shall not be deemed capital expenditures for purposes of Section 99267.

The power of an operator to levy taxes shall not be a prerequisite to its power to issue notes as general obligations pursuant to Article 7.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 812.)
-------------------------------------------

99270.1.

If an operator serves urbanized and nonurbanized areas in the area of jurisdiction of a transportation planning agency, the transportation planning agency shall adopt rules and regulations to determine what portion of the public transportation services of the operator serves urbanized areas and what portion serves nonurbanized areas to determine its required ratio of fare revenues to operating cost, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 99247, or its required ratio of the sum of fare revenues and local support to operating cost, or both.

The transportation planning agency shall submit the rules and
 regulations to the department for approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

99270.2.

If an operator serves an area that was first designated as an urbanized area in the 1980 or a subsequent federal census, the transportation planning agency or the county transportation commission may grant the operator time, but not more than five years from July 1 of the year following the year of the census, to meet the ratio of fare revenues to operating cost required of an operator serving an urbanized area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1399, Sec. 5.   Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1399.)
-------------------------------------------

99270.5.

In determining whether there is compliance with Section 99268.1, 99268.2, 99268.3, 99268.4, 99268.5, or 99268.9, as the case may be, by operators serving the area of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, excluding the City and County of San Francisco, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission may make that determination for all or some of the operators as a group, if the Metropolitan Transportation Commission finds that the public transportation services of the operators grouped are coordinated.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 99270 (as added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1002) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 213.)
-------------------------------------------

99270.6.

In determining whether there is compliance with Section 99268.1, 99268.2, 99268.3, 99268.4, 99268.5, or 99268.9, as the case may be, by operators serving the area of Sacramento County and the cities within the county, the Sacramento Area Council of Governments may make that determination for all or some of the operators as a group, if the Sacramento Area Council of Governments finds that the public transportation services of the operators grouped are coordinated. Notwithstanding any
 other provision of this article, the fare recovery ratio for the Sacramento Regional Transit District shall be no less than 23 percent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 229, Sec. 1.   (AB 432)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99271.

(a) An operator shall be eligible for allocations under this article, on and after July 1, 1976, only if the current cost of its retirement system is fully funded with respect to the officers and employees of its public transportation system, or if the operator is implementing a plan approved by the transportation planning agency which will fully fund the retirement system for such officers and employees within 40 years.

(b) “Fully funded” with respect to the retirement system, means that the system, at any particular time, has assets determined to be sufficient to provide for the
 payment of all pension and other benefits to such officers and employees then entitled, or who may become entitled, under terms of the system to an immediate or deferred benefit in respect to service rendered by such officers and employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

99272.

An operator that has a private pension plan shall be eligible for allocations under this article, on and after July 1, 1976, only if the operator does both of the following:

(a) Conducts periodic actuarial studies of its employee pension plans to determine the annual cost of future pension benefits.

(b) Sets aside and invests, on a current basis, funds sufficient to provide for the payment of future pension benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 988, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

99273.

An operator that has a private pension plan shall be eligible for allocations under this article, on and after July 1, 1976, only if the operator reports in its financial statements, at least annually, all of the following:

(a) The actuarially determined amount of pension liability.

(b) The amount of cash funds set aside and invested to meet the pension liability.

(c) The amount of any deficit in the pension fund.

(d) The financial plan adopted to eliminate the deficit in the pension fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Claims for Community Transit Services [99275. - 99277.]

99275.

(a) Claims may be filed with the transportation planning agency by claimants for community transit services, including such services for those, such as the disabled, who cannot use conventional transit services.

(b) For purposes of this article, “community transit services” means transportation services which link intracommunity origins and destinations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

99275.5.

(a) Claims, for purposes of this article, shall be filed in the same manner as claims are filed for purposes of Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260).

(b) The transportation planning agencies shall adopt criteria, rules, and regulations for the evaluation of claims filed under this article and the determination of the cost effectiveness of the proposed community transit services to be provided under the claims.

(c) Prior to approving a claim filed under this article, the transportation planning
 agency shall make all of the following findings:

(1) That the proposed community transit service is responding to a transportation need currently not being met in the community of the claimant.

(2) That the service shall be integrated with existing transit services, if appropriate.

(3) That the claimant has prepared an estimate of revenues, operating costs, and patronage.

(4) That the claimant is in compliance with Section 99268.3, 99268.4, 99268.5, or 99268.9, whichever is applicable to it, or with regional, countywide, or county subarea performance criteria, local match requirements, or fare recovery ratios adopted by resolution of the transportation planning agency or the county transportation commission for any or all types of community transit
 services. 

(A) In adopting the performance criteria, local match requirements, or fare recovery ratios, the transportation planning agency or the county transportation commission may adopt the criteria of Section 99268.3, 99268.4, 99268.5, or 99268.9, or any combination or all of them.

(B) If a transportation planning agency or county transportation commission has adopted performance criteria, local match requirements, or fare recovery ratios, the rules and regulations of the agency or commission apply, and Sections 99205.7 and 99241, subdivision (a) of Section 99247, and Section 99268.8 do not apply.

(5) That the claimant is in compliance with Sections 99155 and 99155.5.

(d) A transportation planning agency or county transportation commission shall
 allocate no funds to a claimant not in compliance with Sections 99155 and 99155. 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1036, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

99276.

Each claimant receiving funds allocated for purposes of this article shall submit an annual certified fiscal audit pursuant to Section 99245.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1002.)
-------------------------------------------

99277.

Claimants may contract on the basis of competitive bidding to provide community transit services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 988, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Relationships Between Operators [99280. - 99299.]

99280.

An included municipal operator shall not establish a public transportation system either by adding new routes or extending existing routes, by acquisition or otherwise, outside of its boundaries and outside of the reserved service area consisting of the area that would be formed by joining all points that are distant three-quarters of one mile from any point of any of its regularly scheduled routes in existence and in operation on March 1, 1971. No point within such reserved service area shall be more than three-quarters of a mile from a point on one of such regularly scheduled routes, without first providing the governing board of the transit district with a 60-day
 advance written notice of its intention to add new routes or extend existing routes outside of the reserved service area. Within 30 days of receiving such written notice, the governing body of the transit district shall either (a) notify the included municipal operator that the transit district does not intend to add or extend the routes in question itself, in which case the included municipal operator may proceed with implementation of its plans; or (b) serve immediate notice upon the included municipal operator that the transit district desires to establish the proposed new service itself and is otherwise not precluded from doing so. In the event that the governing body of the transit district elects to provide the service in question, it shall institute such service within 60 days of the time proposed by the included municipal operator for initiation of such service.

The operation by included municipal operators of new or extended routes established pursuant to
 this section are subject to the condition whereby the transit district may assume operation of such new or extended routes, if it is not otherwise precluded from doing so, after a 60-day notification by the transit district to the included municipal operator. No route so assumed by the transit district may be abandoned by the transit district without first serving a 60-day written notice of intent to abandon on the included municipal operator which previously provided the service. Subsequent to the abandonment by the transit district, the included municipal operator may, at its option, resume service if it is not otherwise precluded from doing so.

Any included municipal operator, as a condition precedent to filing a claim under Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) of this chapter, shall file with the transportation planning agency a certified route map showing those regularly scheduled routes in existence and in operation on March 1, 1971, outside of its
 boundaries. Such certified map shall also indicate by an appropriate legend the service area where the consent of the transit district is not required under the terms of this section.

The establishment of new routes, or the extension of existing routes, outside the boundaries of an included municipal operator, but within the reserved service area, as defined in this section, shall not be permitted where the operation or establishment of such routes will compete with or divert patronage from a route of the transit district as of the date the transit district is given the notice hereinafter required. Before any such new routes are established or existing routes are extended, the included municipal operator shall give the transit district an appropriate 60-day notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

99281.

The transit district may operate or establish new routes or extend existing routes in all or part of the area outside a municipal operator, except where the operation or establishment of that service will compete with or divert patronage from an existing service of any included municipal operator or service in a reserved service area under Section 99280. However, this limitation upon the district does not apply with respect to services established outside a reserved service area by an included municipal operator under Section 99280.

Unless both the department and the statutorily created regional
 transportation planning agency designate otherwise, the transit district has the sole prerogative of using funds available under this chapter for the purpose of constructing and operating a grade-separated mass transit system, regardless of whether the operation of the system competes with or diverts patronage from any services of an included municipal operator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

99282.

All operators shall be encouraged to establish maximum coordination of public transportation services, fares, transfer privileges, and all other related matters for the overall improvement of public transportation service to the general public requiring such services within the affected areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

99282.5.

Where there are two or more operators within its area of jurisdiction, the transportation planning agency, the county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, as the case may be, shall adopt, not later than July 1, 1980, rules and regulations to provide for transfers between the public transportation services of the operators so that such services will be coordinated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1002.)
-------------------------------------------

99283.

The consent of a transit district to the operation of a public transportation system by an included municipal operator pursuant to Section 99280 may include a requirement for interchange of transfers on an appropriate basis between the public transportation system of the included municipal operator and the public transportation system of the transit district, or any nominee of such transit district, in connection with the furnishing of services by such public transportation systems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

99284.

The violation by a transit district or an included municipal operator of any provisions of this article, or of any agreement between them with regard to providing public transportation services, shall disqualify the violator from filing a public transportation claim pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) of this chapter, and the transportation planning agency shall take no further action in connection with the approval of any pending public transportation claim of such violator until it determines that such violation has ceased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

99285.

(a) The county transportation commissions created pursuant to Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000), including those agencies in Los Angeles County created by statute that assume the same statutory obligations as county transportation commissions, shall submit to the transportation planning agency those claims to be funded, and the transportation planning agency shall approve only those claims submitted.

(b) Each commission shall adopt appropriate criteria by which
 claims shall be analyzed and evaluated, and shall approve only those claims which will provide for a coordinated public transportation system consistent with the adopted transportation improvement program and adopted regional transportation plan and which will not result in undesirable duplication of public transportation services.

(c) In considering proposals, the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority shall consider, among other things, the fare revenue to operating cost ratio and the public transit service mileage of each operator in the authority operating area, but under no circumstances shall the included municipal operators in existence and receiving formula allocation program funding on July 1, 1996, receive less than the percentage of state, federal, and local funds allocated in the 1995–96 fiscal year for bus services. An operator designated as an included municipal operator effective July 1, 1996, shall, under no
 circumstances, receive less than its percentage of state, federal, and local funds for eligible services pursuant to the formula specified in subdivision (d).

Under no circumstances shall included or eligible municipal operators, as defined in Sections 99207 and 99207.5, respectively, in existence on July 1, 1996, and receiving formula-equivalent funding from sources other than federal operating funds pursuant to Section 5307 of Title 49 of the United State Code, and funds claimed under Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) and Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 99310) of this chapter receive less than the proportional share allocated during the 1995–96 fiscal year from the Proposition A 40 percent fund and other available funding sources.

(d) Commencing with the 1996–97 fiscal year, eligible and included municipal operators and the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority shall
 continue to be allocated not less than the amount that would be allocated to them under the formula allocation procedure in effect July 1, 1995, and under subdivision (i). Based upon audited transit performance data submitted for bus transit operations covering the most recent year for which audited data is available, each of those operator’s share of the funds available for allocation shall be calculated as follows: 50 percent of the operator’s vehicle service miles, and 50 percent of the operator’s passenger revenues divided by its base cash fare.

(e) A three-fourths vote of the principal members of the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority shall be required to modify the formulas for allocating of funds available for bus service under this section to the authority operator and included and eligible municipal operators, as defined or described in Sections 99207, 99207.5, and 130050.2.

(f) (1) A two-thirds vote of the members shall be required in order to establish or change the criteria for admitting new included municipal operators for eligibility for funds allocated under Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260).

(2) A two-thirds vote of the members shall be required, based on the criteria in effect under paragraph (1), to allocate funds under Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) to any “included municipal operator,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 99207, which has not previously received funds under this article.

(g) The Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority shall give equal consideration to the capital projects of all operators in the county, and shall allocate regional federal bus transit capital funds based on the authority’s capital
 allocation procedure existing on July 1, 1995, exclusive of funds specifically earmarked by federal law for other purposes.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that neither this section nor the creation of the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority and its operating organizational unit shall impact the allocation of funds pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400) by local agencies currently eligible to receive these funds. 

(i) As part of the formula allocation procedure used to distribute from a state transit assistance fund, the Mills-Deddeh Transportation Development Act (Division 11 (commencing with Section 120000) of the Public Utilities Code), Section 5307 of Title 49 of the United States Code, and Proposition A 40 percent funds pursuant to this chapter, and federal operating funds to Los Angeles County operators, eligible and included